Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 1

Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act

34-6-101. Short title — Construction of part.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act.”

This part shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this part among states enacting it. Nothing in this part shall be construed as abolishing or otherwise adversely affecting the conservatorship law or limited guardianship.

Acts 1983, ch. 299, §§ 1, 8; T.C.A., §§34-13-101,34-6-107.

Cross-References. Conservatorship, title 34, ch. 3.

Presumption as to deeds by attorneys after twenty years' registration, §66-26-108.

Presumption as to powers of attorney after twenty years, §66-26-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-102, 4-103.

Law Reviews.

Attorney v. Client — Privity, Malpractice, and the Lack of Respect for the Primacy of the Attorney-Client Relationship in Estate Planning, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 261 (2001).

Helping Your Clients with End-of-Life Directives: Who Will Decide? (Charles M. Key), 42 Tenn B.J. 13 (2006).

Living Wills, Organ Donation, and Durable Powers of Attorney (John K. Fockler), 23 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 23 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of appointment as conservator upon power of attorney to sell land, OAG 97-156, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180 (11/14/97).

Ability of a person possessing limited communication skills to execute a power of attorney. OAG 10-89, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 95 (7/29/10).

Duties and liabilities of district public guardian. OAG 13-36, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (5/2/13).

34-6-102. “Durable power of attorney” defined.

A durable power of attorney is a power of attorney by which a principal designates another as the principal's attorney in fact in writing and the writing contains the words “This power of attorney shall not be affected by subsequent disability or incapacity of the principal,” or “This power of attorney shall become effective upon the disability or incapacity of the principal,” or similar words showing the intent of the principal that the authority conferred shall be exercisable, notwithstanding the principal's subsequent disability or incapacity.

Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 2; T.C.A., §34-13-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-102.

Law Reviews.

The Shifting Focus of Estate Planning from Death to Disability (Ronald Lee Gilman), 25 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of a person possessing limited communication skills to execute a power of attorney. OAG 10-89, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 95 (7/29/10).

34-6-103. Effect of acts done by attorney.

All acts done by an attorney in fact pursuant to a durable power of attorney during any period of disability or incapacity of the principal have the same effect and inure to the benefit of and bind the principal and the principal's successor in interest as if the principal were competent and not disabled.

Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., §34-13-103.

34-6-104. Effect of appointment of conservator, guardian or other fiduciary — Nomination by principal.

If, following execution of a durable power of attorney, a court of the principal's domicile appoints a conservator, guardian of the estate or other fiduciary charged with the management of all of the principal's property or all of the principal’s property except specified exclusions, the attorney in fact is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The fiduciary has the same power to revoke or amend the power of attorney that the principal would have had if the principal were not disabled or incapacitated.

A principal may nominate, by a durable power of attorney, the conservator, guardian of the estate or guardian of the principal's person for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal's person or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of attorney except for good cause or disqualification.

Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 4; T.C.A., §34-13-104.

34-6-105. Effect of death, disability or incapacity of principal.

The death of a principal who has executed a written power of attorney, durable or otherwise, does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney in fact or other person, who, without actual knowledge of the death of the principal, acts in good faith under the power. Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds successors in interest of the principal.

The disability or incapacity of a principal who has previously executed a written power of attorney that is not a durable power does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney in fact or other person, who without actual knowledge of the disability or incapacity of the principal, acts in good faith under the power. Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and the principal's successors in interest.

As to acts undertaken in good faith reliance thereon, an affidavit executed by the attorney in fact under either a durable power of attorney, stating that the attorney in fact does not have actual knowledge of the termination of the durable power of attorney by revocation or death of the principal at the time of the exercise of the power, or a power of attorney that is not durable, stating that the attorney in fact does not have actual knowledge of the termination of the power of attorney by revocation or disability, incapacity or death of the principal at the time of the exercise of the power, is conclusive proof of the nonrevocation or nontermination of the power at that time. If the exercise of the power of attorney requires execution and delivery of any instrument that is recordable, the affidavit when authenticated for record is likewise recordable. This subsection (c) does not affect any provision in a power of attorney for its termination by expiration of time or occurrence of an event other than express revocation in the principal's capacity.

Acts 1983, ch. 299, §§ 5, 6; T.C.A., §§34-13-105,34-13-106; Acts 2007, ch. 8, § 8.

Cross-References. Power of attorney for health care, right to die naturally, title 34, ch. 6, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-102.

Law Reviews.

The Shifting Focus of Estate Planning from Death to Disability (Ronald Lee Gilman), 25 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1989).

34-6-106. Bond.

The next of kin of any principal who has executed a durable power of attorney under this part may, upon the disability or incapacity of the principal, petition a court of competent jurisdiction to require a bond of the attorney in fact.

If, after consideration of the interests of all parties involved, the court deems a bond necessary, it shall have the authority to order the attorney in fact to execute a bond in an amount deemed appropriate by the court.

Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 7; T.C.A., §34-13-107.

34-6-107. Fiduciary relationship of attorney in fact with the principal.

An attorney in fact is in a fiduciary relationship with the principal, but only to the extent that the attorney in fact undertakes to act under the power of attorney. Among the fiduciary duties required by law, an attorney in fact has a duty to adequately account to the principal, or to any legal representative of the principal appointed by the principal or by a court, for actions taken by the attorney in fact in the exercise of the power of attorney. It is the intent of the general assembly that this section have retroactive application.

Acts 2007, ch. 8, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former §34-6-107, concerning the construction of this part, was transferred to §34-6-101 in 1991.

34-6-108. Incorporation of statutory attorney in fact — Powers by reference.

Upon the principal clearly expressing an intention to do so within the instrument creating a power of attorney, the language contained in § 34-6-109 may be incorporated into the power of attorney by appropriate reference. The provisions so incorporated shall apply to the attorney in fact with the same effect and subject to the same judicial interpretation and control in appropriate cases, as though the language were set forth verbatim in such instrument.

Nothing contained in this section and § 34-6-109 shall be construed to limit the power of the principal either to:

Grant any additional powers to the attorney in fact, including any powers otherwise excluded under subsection (c); or

Delete any of the powers otherwise granted in § 34-6-109.

Nothing contained in this section and § 34-6-109 shall be construed to vest an attorney in fact with, or authorize an attorney in fact to exercise, any of the following powers:

Make gifts, grants, or other transfers without consideration, except in fulfillment of charitable pledges made by the principal while competent;

Exercise any powers of revocation, amendment, or appointment that the principal may have over the income or principal of any trust;

Act on behalf of the principal in connection with any fiduciary position held by the principal, except to renounce or resign the position;

Exercise any incidents of ownership on any life insurance policies owned by the principal on the life of the attorney in fact;

Change beneficiary designations on any death benefits payable on account of the death of the principal from any life insurance policy, employee benefit plan, or individual retirement account;

Change, add or delete any right of survivorship designation on any property, real or personal, to which the principal holds title, alone or with others;

Renounce or disclaim any property or interest in property or powers to which the principal may become entitled, whether by gift or testate or intestate succession;

Exercise any right, or refuse, release or abandon any right, to claim an elective share in any estate or under any will; or

Make any decisions regarding medical treatments or health care, except as incidental to decisions regarding property and finances.

Nothing contained in this section and § 34-6-109 shall be construed to limit the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to prohibit an attorney in fact from taking any action, or to restrain an attorney in fact in the taking of any action, notwithstanding the authorizations or powers vested in the attorney in fact by any written instrument into which all or any part of § 34-6-109 is incorporated by reference.

Acts 1991, ch. 197, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Planning for Incompetency Made Difficult: Legislation Provides Traps for the Unwary (David E. Fowler), 28 Tenn. B.J. 18 (1992).

34-6-109. Attorney in fact — Powers.

Without diminution or restriction of the powers vested in the attorney in fact, by law or elsewhere in the instrument, and subject to all other provisions of the instrument, the attorney in fact, without the necessity of procuring any judicial authorization, or approval, shall be vested with and in the application of the attorney in fact's best judgment and discretion on behalf of the principal shall be authorized to exercise the powers specifically enumerated in this section:

Generally do, sign or perform in the principal's name, place and stead any act, deed, matter or thing whatsoever, that ought to be done, signed or performed, or that, in the opinion of the attorney in fact, ought to be done, signed or performed in and about the premises, of every nature and kind whatsoever, to all intents and purposes whatsoever, as fully and effectually as the principal could do if personally present and acting. The enumeration of specific powers hereunder shall not in any way limit the general powers conferred here;

Receive from or disburse to any source whatever moneys through checking or savings or other accounts or otherwise, endorse, sign and issue checks, withdrawal receipts or any other instrument, and open or close any accounts in the principal's name alone or jointly with any other person;

Buy, sell, lease, alter, maintain, pledge or in any way deal with real and personal property and sign each instrument necessary or advisable to complete any real or personal property transaction, including, but not limited to, deeds, deeds of trust, closing statements, options, notes and bills of sale;

Make, sign and file each income, gift, property or any other tax return or declaration required by the United States or any state, county, municipality or other legally constituted authority;

Acquire, maintain, cancel or in any manner deal with any policy of life, accident, disability, hospitalization, medical or casualty insurance, and prosecute each claim for benefits due under any policy;

Provide for the support and protection of the principal, or of the principal's spouse, or of any minor child of the principal or of the principal's spouse dependent upon the principal, including, without limitation, provision for food, lodging, housing, medical services, recreation and travel;

Have free and private access to any safe deposit box in the principal's individual name, alone or with others, in any bank, including authority to have it drilled, with full right to deposit and withdraw from the safe deposit box or to give full discharge for the safe deposit box;

Receive and give receipt for any money or other obligation due or to become due to the principal from the United States, or any agency or subdivision of the United States, and to act as representative payee for any payment to which the principal may be entitled, and effect redemption of any bond or other security in which the United States, or any agency or subdivision of the United States, is the obligor or payor, and give full discharge therefor;

Contract for or employ agents, accountants, advisors, attorneys and others for services in connection with the performance by the principal's attorney in fact of any powers in this section;

Buy United States government bonds redeemable at par in payment of any United States estate taxes imposed at principal's death;

Borrow money for any of the purposes described in this section, and secure the borrowings in the manner the principal's attorney in fact deems appropriate, and use any credit card held in the principal's name for any of the purposes described in this section;

Establish, utilize, and terminate checking and savings accounts, money market accounts and agency accounts with financial institutions of all kinds, including securities brokers and corporate fiduciaries;

Invest or reinvest each item of money or other property and lend money or property upon the terms and conditions and with the security the principal's attorney in fact may deem appropriate, or renew, extend, or modify loans, all in accordance with the fiduciary standards of § 35-3-117;

Engage in and transact any and all lawful business of whatever nature or kind for the principal and in the principal's name, whether as partner, joint adventurer, stockholder, or in any other manner or form, and vote any stock or enter voting trusts;

Pay dues to any club or organization to which the principal belongs, and make charitable contributions in fulfillment of any charitable pledge made by the principal;

Transfer any property owned by the principal to any revocable trust created by the principal with provisions for the principal's care and support;

Sue, defend or compromise suits and legal actions, and employ counsel in connection with the suits and legal actions, including the power to seek a declaratory judgment interpreting this power of attorney, or a mandatory injunction requiring compliance with the instructions of the principal's attorney in fact, or actual and punitive damages against any person failing or refusing to follow the instructions of the principal's attorney in fact;

Reimburse the attorney in fact or others for all reasonable costs and expenses actually incurred and paid by that person on behalf of the principal;

Create, contribute to, borrow from and otherwise deal with an employee benefit plan or individual retirement account for the principal's benefit, select any payment option under any employee benefit plan or individual retirement account in which the principal is a participant or change options the principal has selected, make “roll-overs” of plan benefits into other retirement plans, and apply for and receive payments and benefits;

Execute other power of attorney forms on behalf of the principal that may be required by the internal revenue service, financial or brokerage institutions, or others, naming the attorney in fact under this section as attorney in fact for the principal on such additional forms;

Request, receive and review any information, verbal or written, regarding the principal's personal affairs or the principal's physical or mental health, including legal, medical and hospital records, execute any releases or other documents that may be required in order to obtain that information, and disclose that information to persons, organizations, firms or corporations the principal's attorney in fact deems appropriate;

Make advance arrangements for the principal's funeral and burial, including the purchase of a burial plot and marker, if the principal has not already done so; and

Access any catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the principal, and any other digital asset in which the principal has a right or interest, pursuant to the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act, compiled in title 35, chapter 8. For purposes of this subdivision (23), “catalogue of electronic communications” and “digital asset” have the same meaning as defined in the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act.

Acts 1991, ch. 197, § 3; 2014, ch. 829, § 4; 2016, ch. 570, § 21.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (23).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 570, § 24. July 1, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Planning for Incompetency Made Difficult: Legislation Provides Traps for the Unwary (David E. Fowler), 28 Tenn. B.J. 18 (1992).

Tennessee's Creative Solution: Estate Planning After Incompetence (Dan. W. Holbrook), 35 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 13 (1999).

34-6-110. Gifts under power of attorney.

If any power of attorney or other writing:

Authorizes an attorney-in-fact or other agent to do, execute or perform any act that the principal might or could do; or

Evidences the principal's intent to give the attorney-in-fact or agent full power to handle the principal's affairs or to deal with the principal's property;

then the attorney-in-fact or agent shall have the power and authority to make gifts, in any amount, of any of the principal's property, to any individuals, or to organizations described in §§ 170(c) and 2522(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. §§ 170 and 2522), or corresponding future provisions of the federal tax law, or both, in accordance with the principal's personal history of making or joining in the making of lifetime gifts. This section shall not in any way limit the right or power of any principal, by express words in the power of attorney or other writing, to authorize, or limit the authority of, any attorney-in-fact or other agent to make gifts of the principal's property.

If subsection (a) does not apply, an attorney-in-fact or other agent acting under a durable general power of attorney or other writing may petition a court of the principal's domicile for authority to make gifts of the principal's property to the extent not inconsistent with the express terms of the power of attorney or other writing. The court shall determine the amounts, recipients and proportions of any gifts of the principal's property after considering all relevant factors including, without limitation:

The value and nature of the assets of the principal's estate;

The principal's foreseeable obligations and maintenance needs;

The principal's existing estate plan; and

The gift and estate tax effects of the gifts.

This section is declaratory of existing law in this state; provided, that this section shall not be construed as authorizing the refund of any taxes imposed by title 67, chapter 8.

Acts 1997, ch. 407, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee's Creative Solution: Estate Planning After Incompetence (Dan. W. Holbrook), 35 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 13 (1999).

34-6-111. Access to medical information by personal representative for limited purpose of determining disability or incapacity when effective date of power of attorney deferred.

The principal of a power of attorney pursuant to this part may direct that the power of attorney is effective at the date signed or may defer the effective date to the date the principal is determined to be disabled or incapacitated. Notwithstanding any language in the document establishing the power of attorney, if the effective date is stated as deferred to the time the principal is determined to be disabled or incapacitated, for the limited purposes of authorizing the agent designated in the power of attorney to have access to the principal's medical records, physicians, other medical personnel and to discuss the principal's health situation and particularly to comply with the HIPAA rules, the power of attorney nevertheless is effective at the date of signing and the person designated the attorney in fact shall thereupon be the principal's personal representative as that term is used in the HIPAA rules with the ability to access immediately the principal's medical records, physicians, other medical personnel and to discuss the principal's health situation for the limited purpose of determining whether the principal is disabled or incapacitated to the extent that the general provisions of the power of attorney become effective.

Acts 2004, ch. 8, § 4; 2007, ch. 8, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. HIPAA, referred to in this section, is the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.

Cross-References. Release of personal health information to determine capacity, §35-50-127.

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of a person possessing limited communication skills to execute a power of attorney. OAG 10-89, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 95 (7/29/10).

34-6-112. Access to electronic communications.

Subject to the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act, compiled in title 35, chapter 8, if any power of attorney expressly grants an attorney-in-fact or other agent authority over the content of an electronic communication of the principal, then the attorney-in-fact or other agent shall have the power and authority to access the content of an electronic communication that the custodian is permitted to disclose under the Electronic Communications Privacy Act (18 U.S.C. § 2702(b)). For purposes of this section, “content of an electronic communication,” “custodian,” and “electronic communication” have the same meaning as defined in the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act.

Acts 2016, ch. 570, § 22.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 570, § 24. July 1, 2016.